District of Columbia statutes.
2-1226.01

Implementation of the Framework Plan.

(a)

For all projects within the Anacostia Waterfront Development Zone, the Mayor shall:

(1)

Implement, induce, assist, facilitate, and coordinate implementation of the Anacostia Waterfront Framework Plan, dated November 2003, as amended or supplemented (“Framework Plan”), and any small area plans within the Anacostia Waterfront Development Zone approved by the Council;

(2)

Induce, assist, and facilitate efforts to improve the environmental integrity of waterways within the Anacostia Waterfront Development Zone; and

(3)

Exercise regional leadership for the restoration of the Anacostia River.

(b)

The Mayor may amend or supplement the Framework Plan; provided, that a proposed amendment or supplement shall be:

(1)

Made available by the Mayor to the public for a 30-day period of public review and comment; and

(2)

Submitted to the Council for a 60-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess, along with a proposed resolution to approve the proposed amendment or supplement. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed resolution within the 60-day period, the proposed amendment or supplement shall be deemed disapproved.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 401, 55 DCR 1689
This section is referenced in § 2-1225.21.
D.C. Law 17-53, § 401, added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 401. Anacostia Waterfront Initiative and Framework Plan.
“(a) The Mayor shall be guided by the Anacostia Waterfront Initiative Framework Plan, dated November 2003, as amended or supplemented (‘Framework Plan’), and any small area plan approved by the Council with respect to the projects carried out inside the Anacostia Waterfront Development Zone.
“(b) The Mayor may amend or supplement the Framework Plan; provided, that the Mayor shall transmit to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess, a proposed resolution to approve any proposed amendment or supplement. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed resolution within the 45-day period, the proposed resolution shall be deemed approved.”
Section 702(b) of D.C. Law 17-53 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 401 of National Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-71, July 20, 2007, 54 DCR 7390).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 401 of National Capitol Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-152, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10900).

Section 801 of D.C. Law 17-138 provided: “This act shall sunset on September 30, 2008, if the fiscal effect of this act has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 305(a) of D.C. Law 17-353 repeals section 801 of D.C. Law 17-138. Section 305(b) of D.C. Law 17-353 provided that this section shall apply as of September 29, 2009.